California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) To county offices of education, the amount of those revenues that would be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 multiplied by 1.85185.

(b) To community college districts, the amount of those revenues that would be allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3 multiplied by 1.85185.

(c) To school districts the remainder after the allocations made in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 757, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.68.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in allocating ad valorem property tax revenue allocations for each fiscal year during the fiscal adjustment period, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) The total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise required to be allocated to a county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund shall be reduced by the countywide adjustment amount.

(2) The countywide adjustment amount shall be deposited in a Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund that shall be established in the treasury of each county.

(b) For purposes of this
 section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Fiscal adjustment period” means the period beginning with the 2004–05 fiscal year and continuing through the later of either of the following:

(A) The fiscal year in which the Director of Finance notifies the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 99006 of the Government Code.

(B) The fiscal year in which an additional countywide adjustment amount, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), is determined.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), the “countywide adjustment amount” means the combined total revenue
 loss of the county and each city in the county that is annually estimated by the Director of Finance, based upon the actual amount of sales and use tax revenues transmitted under Section 7204 in that county in the prior fiscal year and any projected growth on that amount for the current fiscal year as determined by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration and reported to the director on or before August 15 of each fiscal year during the fiscal adjustment period, to result for each of those fiscal years from the 0.25-percent reduction in local sales and use rate tax authority applied by Section 7203.1. The director shall adjust the estimates described in this paragraph if the board reports to them any changes in the projected growth in local sales and use tax revenues for the current fiscal year.

(3) “In lieu local
 sales and use tax revenues” means those revenues that are transferred under this section to a county or a city from a Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund or an Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), for each fiscal year during the fiscal adjustment period, in lieu sales and use tax revenues in the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund shall be allocated among the county and the cities in the county, and those allocations shall be subsequently adjusted, as follows:

(1) The Director of Finance shall, on or before September 1 of each fiscal year during the fiscal adjustment period, notify each county auditor of that portion of the countywide adjustment amount for that fiscal year that is attributable to the county and to each city within
 that county.

(2) The county auditor shall allocate revenues in the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund among the county and cities in the county in the amounts described in paragraph (1). The auditor shall allocate one-half of the amount described in paragraph (1) in each January during the fiscal adjustment period and shall allocate the balance of that amount in each May during the fiscal adjustment period.

(3) After the end of each fiscal year during the fiscal adjustment period, other than a fiscal year subject to subdivision (d), the Director of Finance shall, based on the actual amount of sales and use tax revenues that were not transmitted for the prior fiscal year, recalculate each amount estimated under paragraph (1) and notify the county auditor of the recalculated
 amount.

(4) If the amount recalculated under paragraph (3) for the county or any city in the county is greater than the amount allocated to that local agency under paragraph (2), the county auditor shall, in the fiscal year next following the fiscal year for which the allocation was made, transfer an amount of ad valorem property tax revenue equal to this difference from the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund to that local agency.

(5) If the amount recalculated under paragraph (3) for the county or any city in the county is less than the amount allocated to that local agency under paragraph (2), the county auditor shall, in the fiscal year next following the fiscal year for which the allocation was made, reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise
 allocated to that city or county from the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund by an amount equal to this difference and instead allocate this difference to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund.

(6) If there is an insufficient amount of moneys in a county’s Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund to make the transfers required by paragraph (4), the county auditor shall transfer from the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund an amount sufficient to make the full amount of these transfers.

(d) (1) At such time as the Director of Finance estimates that the notification described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is likely to occur within the subsequent 12 months, the director shall, at the beginning of each subsequent calendar year
 quarter, determine the month in which the notification will occur.

(2) (A) In the calendar year quarter in which the Director of Finance determines that the notification described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) will occur within either the current or subsequent quarter, the director shall revise the countywide adjustment amount described in subdivision (c) for the current fiscal year such that the countywide adjustment amount is calculated only through the quarter in which the director gives notification pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). The director, when appropriate, may revise the countywide adjustment amount described in subdivision (c) for the subsequent fiscal year such that the countywide adjustment amount described in subdivision (c) is calculated only
 through the quarter in which the director gives notification pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(B) If the determination regarding the notification described in subparagraph (A) is revised, the countywide adjustment amount calculated in subparagraph (A) for either the current or the subsequent fiscal year shall be recalculated such that the countywide adjustment amount described in subdivision (c) is calculated only through the quarter in which the Director of Finance gives notification pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) (A) After the end of the revenue exchange period, the Director of Finance shall do both of the following:

(i) Provide to the Controller, with a copy to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, a schedule providing for a transfer from the Fiscal Recovery Fund, established pursuant to Section 99008 of the Government Code, to the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund of either of the following amounts:

(I) An amount equal to the local sales and use tax revenue not received by the county and each city in the county during the revenue exchange period as a result of the 0.25-percent reduction in local sales and use tax authority applied by Section 7203.1 minus the sum of all countywide adjustment amounts deposited during the revenue exchange period, as determined by the director. This amount shall be summed over all counties.

(II) If the amount summed over all counties in subclause (I) is greater
 than the difference between the balance in the Fiscal Recovery Fund and an amount sufficient to cover the estimated costs associated with closing the Fiscal Recovery Fund, then a proportion shall be calculated equal to the proportion between the amount in subclause (I) summed over all counties and an amount equal to the difference between the balance in the Fiscal Recovery Fund and an amount sufficient to cover the estimated costs associated with closing the Fiscal Recovery Fund. The amount
 calculated under this subclause is equal to the product of the amount calculated in subclause (I) and the proportion calculated in this subclause.

(ii) Provide a schedule to the auditor of each county of the amounts calculated under clause (i).

(B) If the amount provided for in the schedule required pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) is the amount that is described in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (A), an amount equal to the difference between the amount that is described in subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (A) and the amount that is described in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (A) shall constitute an additional countywide adjustment amount to be applied in the manner prescribed in subdivision (a) for either the current
 or subsequent fiscal year, as determined by the director.

(4) The Controller shall transfer, from the Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund for each county, the amount specified for that county in the schedule provided by the Director of Finance pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(5) Within 60 days of the transfer by the Controller of revenues from the Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund for each county, each county auditor shall allocate revenue to the county and each city in the county per the schedule provided by the Director of Finance pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(6) For purposes of this subdivision,
 “revenue exchange period” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7203.1.

(e) For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, or any successor to that provision, may not reflect any portion of any property tax revenue allocation required by this section for a preceding fiscal year.

(f) This section may not be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Reduce any allocations of excess, additional, or remaining funds that would otherwise have been allocated to cities, counties, cities and counties, or special districts pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.2, clause (i)
 of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 97.3, or Article 4 (commencing with Section 98), had this section not been enacted. The allocation made pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (c) shall be adjusted to comply with this paragraph.

(2) Require an increased ad valorem property tax revenue allocation to a community redevelopment agency.

(3) Alter the manner in which ad valorem property tax revenue growth from fiscal year to fiscal year is determined or allocated in a county.

(g) Existing tax exchange or revenue sharing agreements, entered into prior to the operative date of this section, between local agencies or between local agencies and nonlocal agencies shall be deemed to be temporarily
 modified to account for the reduced sales and use tax revenues, resulting from the temporary reduction in the local sales and use tax rate, with those reduced revenues to be replaced in kind by property tax revenue from a Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund or an Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, on a temporary basis, as provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 1.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

97.69.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, in allocating ad valorem property tax revenues to a Sales and Use Tax Compensation Fund under Section 97.68 or a Vehicle License Fee Property Tax Compensation Fund under Section 97.70, the auditor shall not allocate to those funds the revenues from delinquent and uncollected property taxes on the secured roll that have been pledged or contractually obligated to debt service repayment under Section 6516.6 of the Government Code.

(b) In implementing
 subdivision (a), the auditor shall proportionally increase, using nondelinquent ad valorem property tax revenues, the total amount of the ad valorem property tax revenue reduction, otherwise required by Sections 97.68 and 97.70, for all school entities in the county that have pledged or contractually obligated to debt service repayment revenues from delinquent and uncollected property taxes on the secured roll, by an amount equal to the total amount excluded under subdivision (a) to ensure that there is no reduction in the total amount of the countywide adjustment amount, as defined in Section 97.68, or the total amount of the countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount, as defined in Section 97.70, for any fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 366, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

97.70.

Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2004–05 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) (A) The auditor shall reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to a county’s Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund by the countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount.

(B) If, for the fiscal year, after complying with Section 97.68 there is not enough ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to a county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for the auditor to complete the allocation reduction
 required by subparagraph (A), the auditor shall
 additionally reduce the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to all school districts and community college districts in the county for that fiscal year by an amount equal to the difference between the countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount and the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund for that fiscal year. This reduction for each school district and community college district in the county shall be the percentage share of the total reduction that is equal to the proportion that the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to the school district or community college district bears to the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue that is otherwise required to be allocated to
 all school districts and community college districts in a county. For purposes of this subparagraph, “school districts” and “community college districts” do not include any districts that are excess tax school entities, as defined in Section 95.

(2) The countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount shall be allocated to the Vehicle License Fee Property Tax Compensation Fund that shall be established in the treasury of each county.

(b) (1) The auditor shall allocate moneys in the Vehicle License Fee Property Tax Compensation Fund according to the following:

(A) Each city in the county shall receive its vehicle license fee adjustment amount.

(B) Each county and city and county shall receive its vehicle license fee adjustment amount.

(2) The auditor shall allocate one-half of the amount specified in paragraph (1) on or before January 31 of each fiscal year, and the other one-half on or before May 31 of each fiscal year.

(c) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Vehicle license fee adjustment amount” for a particular city, county, or a city and county means, subject to an adjustment under paragraph (2) and Section 97.71, all of the following:

(A) For the 2004–05 fiscal year, an amount equal to the difference between the following two amounts:

(i) The estimated total amount of revenue that would have been deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, including any amounts that would have been certified to the Controller by the auditor of the County of Ventura under subdivision (j) of Section 98.02, as that section read on January 1, 2004, for distribution under the law as it read on January 1, 2004, to the county, city and county, or city for the 2004–05 fiscal year if the fee otherwise due under the Vehicle License Fee Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2) was 2 percent of the market value of a vehicle, as specified in Sections 10752 and 10752.1 as those sections read on January 1, 2004.

(ii) The estimated total amount of revenue that is required to be distributed
 from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to the county, city and county, and each city in the county for the 2004–05 fiscal year under Section 11005, as that section read on the operative date of the act that amended this clause.

(B) (i) Subject to an adjustment under clause (ii), for the
 2005–06 fiscal year, the sum of the following two amounts:

(I) The difference between the following two amounts:

(ia) The actual total amount of revenue that would have been deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, including any amounts that would have been certified to the Controller by the auditor of the County of Ventura under subdivision (j) of Section 98.02, as that section read on January 1, 2004, for distribution under the law as it read on January 1, 2004, to the county, city and county, or city for the 2004–05 fiscal year if the fee otherwise due under the Vehicle License Fee Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2) was 2 percent of the market value of a vehicle, as specified in Sections
 10752 and 10752.1 as those sections read on January 1, 2004.

(ib) The actual total amount of revenue that was distributed from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund to the county, city and county, and each city in the county for the 2004–05 fiscal year under Section 11005, as that section read on the operative date of the act that amended this subsubclause.

(II) The product of the following two amounts:

(ia) The amount described in subclause (I).

(ib) The percentage change from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year in gross taxable assessed valuation within the jurisdiction of the entity, as reflected in the equalized
 assessment roll for those fiscal years. For the first fiscal year for which a change in a city’s jurisdictional boundaries first applies, the percentage change in gross taxable assessed valuation from the
 prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year shall be calculated solely on the basis of the city’s previous jurisdictional boundaries, without regard to the change in that city’s jurisdictional boundaries. For each following fiscal year, the percentage change in gross taxable assessed valuation from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year shall be calculated on the basis of the city’s current jurisdictional boundaries.

(ii) The amount described in clause (i) shall be adjusted as follows:

(I) If the amount described in subclause (I) of clause (i) for a particular city, county, or city and county is greater than the amount described in subparagraph (A) for that city, county, or city and county, the amount described in clause (i) shall be increased by an
 amount equal to this difference.

(II) If the amount described in subclause (I) of clause (i) for a particular city, county, or city and county is less than the amount described in subparagraph (A) for that city, county, or city and county, the amount described in clause (i) shall be decreased by an amount equal to this difference.

(C) For the 2006–07 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following two amounts:

(i) The vehicle license fee adjustment amount for the prior fiscal year, if Section 97.71 and clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) did not apply for that fiscal year, for that city, county, and city and county.

(ii) The product of the
 following two amounts:

(I) The amount described in clause (i).

(II) The percentage change from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year in gross taxable assessed valuation within the jurisdiction of the entity, as reflected in the equalized assessment roll for those fiscal years. For the first fiscal year for which a change in a city’s jurisdictional boundaries first applies, the percentage change in gross taxable assessed valuation from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year shall be calculated solely on the basis of the city’s previous jurisdictional boundaries, without regard to the change in that city’s jurisdictional boundaries. For each following fiscal year, the percentage change in gross taxable assessed valuation from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal
 year shall be calculated on the basis of the city’s current jurisdictional boundaries.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “vehicle license fee adjustment amount,” for a city incorporating after January 1, 2004, and on or before January 1, 2012, means the following:

(A) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, the quotient derived from the following fraction:

(i) The numerator is the product of the following two amounts:

(I) The sum of the most recent vehicle license fee adjustment amounts determined for all cities in the county.

(II) The population of the incorporating city.

(ii) The denominator is the sum of the populations of all cities in the county.

(B) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following two amounts:

(i) The vehicle license fee adjustment amount for the prior fiscal year.

(ii) The product of the following two amounts:

(I) The amount described in clause (i).

(II) The percentage change from the prior fiscal year to the current fiscal year in gross taxable assessed valuation within the jurisdiction of the entity, as reflected in the equalized assessment roll
 for those fiscal years.

(3) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, the vehicle license fee adjustment amount that is determined under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) for the County of Orange shall be increased by fifty-three million dollars ($53,000,000). For the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the calculation of the vehicle license fee adjustment amount for the County of Orange under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) shall be based on a prior fiscal year amount that reflects the full amount of this one-time increase of fifty-three million dollars ($53,000,000).

(4) “Countywide vehicle license fee adjustment amount” means, for any fiscal year, the total sum of the amounts described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) for a county or city and county, and each city in
 the county.

(5) On or before June 30 of each fiscal year, the auditor shall report to the Controller, in an electronic format provided by the Controller, the vehicle license fee adjustment amount for the county and each city in the county for that fiscal year. The Controller shall make the information available to the public in a readily accessible compiled electronic file via the Controller’s internet website on or before September 1 of each year.

(d) For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, or any successor to that provision, shall not reflect, for a preceding fiscal year, any portion of any allocation required by this section.

(e) For
 purposes of Section 15 of Article XI of the California Constitution, the allocations from a Vehicle License Fee Property Tax Compensation Fund constitute successor taxes that are otherwise required to be allocated to counties and cities, and as successor taxes, the obligation to make those transfers as required by this section shall not be extinguished nor disregarded in any
 manner that adversely affects the security of, or the ability of, a county or city to pay the principal and interest on any debts or obligations that were funded or secured by that city’s or county’s allocated share of motor vehicle license fee revenues.

(f) This section shall not be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Reduce any allocations of excess, additional, or remaining funds that would otherwise have been allocated to county superintendents of schools, cities, counties, and cities and counties pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Sections 97.2 and 97.3 or Article 4 (commencing with Section 98) had this section not been enacted. The allocations required by this section shall be adjusted to comply with this paragraph.

(2) Require an increased ad valorem property tax revenue allocation or increased tax increment allocation to a community redevelopment agency.

(3) Alter the manner in which ad valorem property tax revenue growth from fiscal year to fiscal year is otherwise determined or allocated in a county.

(4) Reduce ad valorem property tax revenue allocations required under Article 4 (commencing with Section 98).

(g) Tax exchange or revenue sharing agreements, entered into prior to the operative date of this section, between local agencies or between local agencies and nonlocal agencies are deemed to be modified to account for the reduced vehicle license fee revenues resulting
 from the act that added this section. These agreements are modified in that these reduced revenues are, in kind and in lieu thereof, replaced with ad valorem property tax revenue from a
 Vehicle License Fee Property Tax Compensation Fund or an Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 329, Sec. 19.   (SB 780)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

97.71.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for each of the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) The total amount of revenue required to be allocated to each county and each city and county under Section 97.70 shall be reduced by the dollar amount indicated as follows:Property
Tax Reduction
per CountyAlameda $ 14,993,115Alpine 13,578Amador 341,856Butte 1,968,640Calaveras 367,372Colusa 227,244Contra Costa 9,266,091Del Norte 260,620El Dorado 1,465,981Fresno 7,778,611Glenn 302,192Humboldt 1,433,725Imperial 1,499,081Inyo 188,370Kern 6,684,032Kings 1,409,501Lake 531,524Lassen 317,119Los Angeles 103,217,625Madera 1,164,287Marin 2,369,777Mariposa 177,419Mendocino 997,570Merced 2,211,012Modoc 119,325Mono 92,964Monterey 3,789,991Napa 1,128,692Nevada 503,547Orange 27,730,861Placer 2,219,818Plumas 238,066Riverside 14,161,003Sacramento 12,232,737San Benito 477,872San Bernardino 16,361,855San Diego 27,470,228San Francisco 15,567,648San Joaquin 6,075,964San Luis Obispo 2,350,289San Mateo 6,704,877Santa Barbara 3,894,357Santa Clara 17,155,293Santa
 Cruz 2,433,423Shasta 1,592,267Sierra 37,051Siskiyou 496,974Solano 3,796,251Sonoma 4,439,389Stanislaus 4,516,707Sutter 764,351Tehama 618,393Trinity 104,770Tulare 3,781,964Tuolumne 515,961Ventura 7,085,556Yolo 1,735,079Yuba 620,137(2) The total amount of reductions for all counties and cities and counties determined pursuant to this subdivision is three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) for the 2004–05 fiscal year and that same amount for the 2005–06 fiscal year.

(b) (1) The total amount of revenue required to be allocated to a city and county under Section 97.70 shall be reduced by the product of the following two amounts:

(A) The percentage represented by the following fraction:

(i) The numerator is the total amount of money allocated to the city and county from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for the 2002–03 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11005, as reported in the State Controller’s Monthly
 Motor Vehicle License Fee Reports for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(ii) The denominator is the total amount of money allocated among all cities and cities and counties from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for the 2002–03 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11005, as reported in the State Controller’s Monthly Motor Vehicle License Fee Reports for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(B) Three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000).

(2) (A) The total amount of revenue required to be allocated to each city under Section 97.70 shall be reduced by the sum of the following three amounts:

(i) The product of the following two amounts:

(I) The percentage represented by the following fraction:

(Ia) The numerator is the total amount of money allocated to the city from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in the State Controller’s Monthly Motor Vehicle License Fee Reports for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(Ib) The denominator is the total amount of money allocated among all cities from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in the State Controller’s Monthly Motor Vehicle License Fee Reports for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(II) The product of the following two amounts:

(IIa) Thirty-three and one-third percent.

(IIb) The difference between three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) and the amount described in paragraph (1).

(ii) The product of the following two amounts:

(I) The percentage represented by the following fraction:

(Ia) The numerator is the total amount of money transmitted to the city under Section 7204 for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in Table 21A of the 2002–03 edition of the State Board of Equalization Annual Report.

(Ib) The denominator is the total amount of money transmitted to all cities under Section 7204 for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in Table 21A of the 2002–03 edition of the State Board of Equalization Annual Report.

(II) The product of the following two amounts:

(IIa) Thirty-three and one-third percent.

(IIb) The difference between three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) and the amount described in paragraph (1).

(iii) The product of the following two amounts:

(I) The percentage represented by the following fraction:

(Ia) The numerator is the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to the city for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Cities Annual Report.

(Ib) The denominator is the total amount of
 ad valorem property tax revenue allocated among all cities for the 2002–03 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Cities Annual Report.

(II) The product of the following two amounts:

(IIa) Thirty-three and one-third percent.

(IIb) The difference between three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) and the amount described in paragraph (1).

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the reduction required by this paragraph for any city shall not be less than 2 percent, nor more than 4 percent, of the general revenues of the city, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Cities Annual Report. If the amount determined for a city under subparagraph (A) exceeds 4 percent of the general revenues of the
 city, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Cities Annual Report, the amount of that excess shall be allocated among the reductions required for all other cities in percentage shares corresponding to those reduction amounts.

(3) On or before September 15, 2004, the Controller shall notify the auditor of each county and city and county of the reductions required by this subdivision.

(4) The total amount of reductions for all cities and cities and counties determined pursuant to this subdivision shall be three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000) for the 2004–05 fiscal year and that same amount for the 2005–06 fiscal year.

(5) (A) In lieu of a reduction under paragraph (2), a city may transmit to the county auditor for deposit in the county Educational Revenue
 Augmentation Fund an amount equal to that reduction. For the 2004–05 fiscal year, if the county auditor does not receive a payment under this paragraph from a city on or before October 1, 2004, the auditor shall make the reduction required by paragraph (2). For the 2005–06 fiscal year, if the county auditor does not receive a payment under this paragraph from a city on or before October 1, 2005, the auditor shall make the reduction required by paragraph (2).

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, to make the transmittals authorized by this paragraph, a city may use any funds or revenues, the use of which is not restricted by federal law or the California Constitution.

(6) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a city that has established a reserve for subsidence contingencies may, for the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years only, retain
 interest earned on that reserve for the previous calendar year in an amount not to exceed the amount of the reduction for that city required by this subdivision.

(B) The Legislature finds and declares that the amounts retained by a city pursuant to subparagraph (A) are in excess of trust needs and are free from the public trust for navigation, commerce, fisheries, and any other trust uses and restrictions.

(C) A city that has retained an amount under subparagraph (A) shall, beginning with the 2006–07 fiscal year, repay to the reserve for subsidence contingencies that amount so retained. The repayment shall be made in annual increments, which increments shall not be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), until the amount retained by the city has been repaid. Those amounts repaid to the reserve for subsidence contingencies are subject to the public trust and shall be
 used only for the purposes prescribed by law for the reserve.

(c) That amount of revenue that is not allocated to a county, city and county, or a city as a result of subdivisions (a) and (b), and that amount that is received by the county auditor under paragraph (5) of subdivision (b), shall be deposited in the county Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund and shall be allocated as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 97.3.

(d) For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amounts determined under subdivision (a) of Section 96.1, or any successor to that provision, shall not reflect, for a preceding fiscal year, any portion of any allocation required by this section.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 211) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 610, Sec. 7.   Effective September 20, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

97.72.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for each of the 2004–05 and 2005–06 fiscal years, all of the following apply:

(a) (1) (A) (i) Except as otherwise provided in clauses (ii) and (iii), the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue, other than these revenues that are pledged to debt service, otherwise allocated for each of those fiscal years to each enterprise special district shall be reduced by the lesser
 of the following:

(I) Forty percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001–02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(II) An amount equal to 10 percent of that district’s total revenues for the 2001–02 fiscal year, from whatever source, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(ii) The total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise allocated for each of those fiscal years to each enterprise special district that is a transit district shall be reduced by 3 percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district for the 2001–02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual
 Report.

(iii) The total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue otherwise allocated for each of those fiscal years to an enterprise special district that also performs, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report, nonenterprise functions other than fire protection or police protection shall be decreased by both of the following, not to exceed 10 percent of a district’s total revenues from whatever source, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report:

(I) Forty percent of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue of the district’s enterprise functions for the 2001–02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(II) Ten percent of the amount of ad valorem
 property tax revenue of the district’s nonenterprise functions for the 2001–02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report.

(B) If an enterprise special district is located in more than one county, the auditor of each county in which that enterprise special district is located shall implement that portion of the total reduction, required by subparagraph (A) with respect to that district, determined by the ratio of the amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that district from the county to the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to that district from all counties.

(2) The Controller shall determine the amount of the ad valorem property tax revenue reduction required by paragraph (1) for each enterprise special district in each county. The Controller shall then determine whether the
 total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue reductions under paragraph (1) and Section 97.73 is less than three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000). If, for either the 2004–05 or 2005–06 fiscal year, the total of the amount of these reductions is less than three hundred fifty million dollars ($350,000,000), the total amount of ad valorem property tax revenue allocated to each enterprise special district, other than an enterprise special district that is a transit district, shall be reduced by an additional amount equal to that district’s proportionate share of the difference, provided that the total reduction under this section for a district shall not exceed 10 percent of that district’s revenue from whatever source for the 2001–02 fiscal year, as reported in the 2001–02 edition of the State Controller’s Special Districts Annual Report. If, as a result of this 10-percent limitation, any portion of the difference remains unapplied, that remaining portion shall, as many times as necessary, be
 applied in proportionate shares among those enterprise special districts, other than transit districts, for which the 10-percent limitation has not been reached, until a three hundred fifty million dollar reduction ($350,000,000) has been applied. The Controller shall, on or before October 25, 2004, notify the Director of Finance of the reduction amounts determined under this subdivision. The Director of Finance shall, on or before November 12, 2004, notify each county auditor of the allocation reductions required by this paragraph and Section 97.73.
